nb: Koblingskjønn: Dame; Hunn til hunn; Hunn til hann; Mann; Hann til hunn; Hann til hann; Annet
ro-RO: Gen conector: Mamă; Mamă la mamă; Mamă la tată; Tată; Tată la mamă; Tată la tată; Altele
zh-CN: 连接器公母: 女性; 母端子对母端子; 母端子对公端子; 男性; 公端子对母端子; 公端子对公端子; 其他
ru: Тип разъема: Внешний; Внешний-внешний; Внешний-внутренний; Внутренний; Внутренний-внешний; Внутренний-внутренний; Другое
zh-TW: 連接器性別: 女性; 母對母; 女對公; 男性; 公對母; 公對公; 其他
it: Genere del connettore: Femmina; Da femmina a femmina; Da femmina a maschio; Maschio; Da maschio a femmina; Da maschio a maschio; Altro
sl-SI: Spol konektorja: Ženski; Ženski/ženski; ženski/moški; Moški; Moški/ženski; Moški/moški; Drugo
tr: Soket Cinsiyeti: Kadın; Dişiden dişiye; Dişiden erkeğe; Erkek; Erkekten dişiye; Erkekten erkeğe; Diğer
pt-PT: Género do conector: Feminino; Fêmea para fêmea; Fêmea para macho; Masculino; Macho para fêmea; Macho para macho; Outro
da: Stikkøn: Kvinde; Hun til hun; Hun til han; Mand; Hun til hun; Han til han; Andet
ko: 커넥터 젠더: 여성; female to female; female to male; 남성; male to female; male to male; 기타
fi: Liittimen sukupuoli: Naiset; Naaraasta naaraaseen; Naaraasta urokseen; Miehet; Uroksesta naaraaseen; Uroksesta urokseen; Muu
pl: Rodzaj złącza: Kobieta; Żeńskie do żeńskiego; Żeńskie do męskiego; Mężczyzna; Męskie do żeńskiego; Męskie do męskiego; Inne
hr-HR: Vrsta konektora: Ženski; Ženski na ženski; Ženski na muški; Muški; Muški na ženski; Muški na muški; Ostalo
en: Connector gender: Female; Female to female; Female to male; Male; Male to female; Male to male; Other
lt-LT: Jungties tipas: Lizdinė; Lizdinė/lizdinė; Lizdinė/kištukinė; Kištukinė; Kištukinė/lizdinė; Kištukinė/kištukinė; Kita
cs: Provedení konektoru (samec, samice): Ženy; Female/Female; Female/Male; Muži; Male/Female; Male/Male; Jiné
ja: コネクタの性別: 女性; 女性から女性; 女性から男性; 男性; 男性から女性; 男性から男性; その他
vi: Giới tính đầu nối: Nữ giới; Cái sang cái; Cái sang đực; Nam giới; Đực sang cái; Đực sang đực; Khác
de: Anschlussart: Weiblich; Weiblich auf weiblich; Weiblich auf männlich; Männlich; Männlich auf weiblich; Männlich auf männlich; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Pohlavie konektora: Zásuvkový; Zásuvka k zásuvke; Zásuvka k zástrčke; Zástrčka; Zástrčka k zásuvke; Zástrčka k zástrčke; Iné
bg-BG: Пол на конекторите: Женски; От женски към женски; От женски към мъжки; Мъжки; От мъжки към женски; От мъжки към мъжки; Други
th: เพศของตัวเชื่อมต่อ: หญิง; ขั้วต่อตัวเมียกับตัวเมีย; ขั้วต่อตัวเมียกับตัวผู้; ชาย; ขั้วต่อตัวผู้กับตัวเมีย; ขั้วต่อตัวผู้กับตัวผู้; อื่นๆ
fr: Genre du connecteur: Féminin; Femelle à femelle; Femelle à mâle; Masculin; De mâle à femelle; De mâle à mâle; Autre
sv: Kön på kontakt: Dam; Dam till dam; Dam till herr; Herr; Herr till dam; Herr till herr; Övrigt
hu: Csatlakozó neme: Anya; Anya-anya; Anya-apa; Apa; Apa-anya; Apa-apa; Egyéb
nl: Connectorgeslacht: Vrouwelijk; Vrouwtje naar vrouwtje; Vrouwtje naar mannetje; Mannelijk; Mannetje naar vrouwtje; Mannetje naar mannetje; Andere
el: Φύλο συνδετήρα: Γυναικείο; Θηλυκό σε θηλυκό; Θηλυκό σε αρσενικό; Ανδρικό; Αρσενικό σε θηλυκό; Αρσενικό σε αρσενικό; Άλλο
pt-BR: Gênero do conector: Feminino; Feminino para feminino; Feminino para masculino; Masculino; Masculino para feminino; Masculino para masculino; Outro
es: Género del conector: Femenino; De hembra a hembra; De hembra a macho; Masculino; Macho a hembra; De macho a macho; Otros